Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1544.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 13, chapter 9, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 13-922, to read: START_STATUTE13-922. Probation records; public records; exemptions; definition A. Notwithstanding any other law, laws that govern access to records of the judicial branch do not apply to adult probation departments, adult probation officers or community supervision units. B. Notwithstanding any other law, all probation records are public records subject to title 39, chapter 1 and must be disclosed on request unless specifically exempt under this section. C. Probation records must be redacted to protect all information listed in this subsection. If protection is not possible through the redaction, the probation records must be withheld to protect the following: 1. Victim information, including the victim's name, address, telephone number and personal identifying information. 2. Identifying information of minors. 3. Medical, psychological or counseling records. 4. Active criminal investigations. 5. The identity of a Confidential informant. D. If a probation record is withheld pursuant to subsection C of this section, the probation department must do all of the following: 1. Provide a written explanation within ten business days. 2. Cite the statute that justifies the nondisclosure. 3. Inform the requester of the right to appeal. E. A person may appeal the withholding of a probation record to the court. The court shall set a hearing on an action under this section within twenty business days after the request is filed. F. A court may impose civil penalties for a violation of this section and may award attorney fees. G. Notwithstanding any other law, the adult probation department shall disclose a person's probation records, including records related to treatment and evaluation, to a person who is on probation on the request of the probationer or the probationer's attorney or authorized representative. H. For the purposes of this section, "probation records" include: 1. Probation violation reports and histories. 2. Internal directives, policy manuals and supervision protocols. 3. Risk assessment results. 4. Case management summaries. 5. Audit reports, inspection reports and performance reviews. 6. Communications between probation officers and supervising agencies. 7. Revocation filings and outcomes. 8. Data on high-risk cases, absconders, failures to appear and interventions. END_STATUTE